th: ความเร็วของระบบขับเคลื่อนที่รองรับ: 10 สปีด; 11 สปีด; 12 สปีด; 13 สปีด; 6 สปีด; 7 สปีด; 8 สปีด; 9 สปีด; อื่นๆ
pl: Kompatybilna liczba przełożeń napędu: 10-rzędowy; 11-rzędowy; 12-rzędowy; 13-rzędowy; 6-rzędowy; 7-rzędowy; 8-rzędowy; 9-rzędowy; Inne
sl-SI: Združljive hitrosti pogonskega sklopa: 10-redni; 11-redni; 12-redni; 13-redni; 6-redni; 7-redni; 8-redni; 9-redni; Drugo
sv: Kompatibla drivlinehastigheter: 10-växlad; 11-växlad; 12-växlad; 13-växlad; 6-växlad; 7-växlad; 8-växlad; 9-växlad; Annat
sk-SK: Kompatibilné rýchlostné stupne hnacieho ústrojenstva: 10-rýchlostné; 11-rýchlostné; 12-rýchlostné; 13-rýchlostné; 6-rýchlostné; 7-rýchlostné; 8-rýchlostné; 9-rýchlostné; Iné
de: Kompatible Antriebsstufen: 10-fach; 11-fach; 12-fach; 13-fach; 6-fach; 7-fach; 8-fach; 9-fach; Sonstige
pt-BR: Velocidades de transmissão compatíveis: 10 velocidades; 11 velocidades; 12 velocidades; 13 velocidades; 6 velocidades; 7 velocidades; 8 velocidades; 9 velocidades; Outro
en: Compatible drivetrain speeds: 10-speed; 11-speed; 12-speed; 13-speed; 6-speed; 7-speed; 8-speed; 9-speed; Other
fi: Yhteensopivat vaihteiston nopeudet: 10-vaihteinen; 11-vaihteinen; 12-vaihteinen; 13-vaihteinen; 6-vaihteinen; 7-vaihteinen; 8-vaihteinen; 9-vaihteinen; Muu
nb: Kompatible drivverkhastigheter: 10-delt; 11-delt; 12-delt; 13-delt; 6-delt; 7-delt; 8-delt; 9-delt; Annet
nl: Compatibele aandrijflijn versnellingen: 10-speed; 11-speed; 12-speed; 13-speed; 6-speed; 7-speed; 8-speed; 9-speed; Overig
pt-PT: Velocidades de transmissão compatíveis: 10 velocidades; 11 velocidades; 12 velocidades; 13 velocidades; 6 velocidades; 7 velocidades; 8 velocidades; 9 velocidades; Outra
ja: 互換性のある駆動速度: 10速; 11速; 12速; 13速; 6速; 7速; 8速; 9速; その他
zh-CN: 适配传动系统速别: 10 速; 11 速; 12 速; 13 速; 6 速; 7 速; 8 速; 9 速; 其他
ro-RO: Viteze sistem de transmisie compatibil: 10 viteze; 11 viteze; 12 viteze; 13 viteze; 6 viteze; 7 viteze; 8 viteze; 9 viteze; Altele
zh-TW: 相容的傳動速別: 10 速; 11 速; 12 速; 13 速; 6 速; 7 速; 8 速; 9 速; 其他
da: Kompatible gearantal i drivlinjen: 10-speed; 11-speed; 12-speed; 13-speed; 6-speed; 7-speed; 8-speed; 9-speed; Andet
hr-HR: Kompatibilne brzine pogonskog sklopa: 10 brzina; 11 brzina; 12 brzina; 13 brzina; 6 brzina; 7 brzina; 8 brzina; 9 brzina; Ostalo
ko: 호환 구동계 단수: 10단; 11단; 12단; 13단; 6단; 7단; 8단; 9단; 기타
lt-LT: Suderinamas pavarų sistemos greičių skaičius: 10 pavarų; 11 pavarų; 12 pavarų; 13 pavarų; 6 pavarų; 7 pavarų; 8 pavarų; 9 pavarų; Kita
vi: Tốc độ truyền động tương thích: 10 tốc độ; 11 tốc độ; 12 tốc độ; 13 tốc độ; 6 tốc độ; 7 tốc độ; 8 tốc độ; 9 tốc độ; Khác
ru: Совместимое количество скоростей трансмиссии: 10-скоростная; 11-скоростная; 12-скоростная; 13-скоростная; 6-скоростная; 7-скоростная; 8-скоростная; 9-скоростная; Другое
hu: Kompatibilis hajtáslánc-sebességek: 10 sebességes; 11 sebességes; 12 sebességes; 13 sebességes; 6 sebességes; 7 sebességes; 8 sebességes; 9 sebességes; Egyéb
es: Compatibilidad con velocidades de transmisión: 10 velocidades; 11 velocidades; 12 velocidades; 13 velocidades; 6 velocidades; 7 velocidades; 8 velocidades; 9 velocidades; Otra
cs: Kompatibilní rychlosti hnacího ústrojí: 10rychlostní; 11rychlostní; 12rychlostní; 13rychlostní; 6rychlostní; 7rychlostní; 8rychlostní; 9rychlostní; Jiné
tr: Uyumlu aktarma sistemi hızları: 10 vitesli; 11 vitesli; 12 vitesli; 13 vitesli; 6 vitesli; 7 vitesli; 8 vitesli; 9 vitesli; Diğer
it: Velocità della trasmissione compatibili: A 10 velocità; A 11 velocità; A 12 velocità; A 13 velocità; A 6 velocità; A 7 velocità; A 8 velocità; A 9 velocità; Altro
fr: Vitesses de transmission compatibles: 10 vitesses; 11 vitesses; 12 vitesses; 13 vitesses; 6 vitesses; 7 vitesses; 8 vitesses; 9 vitesses; Autre
bg-BG: Съвместим брой скорости на трансмисията: С 10 скорости; С 11 скорости; С 12 скорости; С 13 скорости; С 6 скорости; С 7 скорости; С 8 скорости; С 9 скорости; Друго
el: Συμβατές ταχύτητες συστήματος μετάδοσης κίνησης: 10 ταχυτήτων; 11 ταχυτήτων; 12 ταχυτήτων; 13 ταχυτήτων; 6 ταχυτήτων; 7 ταχυτήτων; 8 ταχυτήτων; 9 ταχυτήτων; Άλλο